Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-918
Area withdrawn; outstanding obligations; assessment.

Any area withdrawn from a district shall be subject to assessment and be otherwise chargeable for the payment and discharge of all of the obligations outstanding at the time of the filing of the petition for the withdrawal of the area as fully as though the area had not been withdrawn. All provisions which could be used to compel the payment by a withdrawn area of its portion of the outstanding obligations had the withdrawal not occurred may be used to compel the payment on the part of the area of the portion of the outstanding obligations of the district for which it is liable.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 10, p. 141.